Hawaii statutes.
§657-31.5 Adverse possession. In an
action under this part where the person defending the action claims by adverse
possession in excess of the period of limitation, said claim can only be made:

(1) If the real property which is the subject of the
action is five acres or less; and

(2) Where the person claiming by adverse possession
has not asserted any similar claim, in good faith, within the past twenty
years; however, this shall not include similar claims made before November 7,
1978.

However, any person defending an action under this
part may claim adverse possession if that person's time period of adverse
possession of the land exceeded twenty years prior to November 7, 1978, or
exceeded other earlier applicable time periods of adverse possession. [L 1979,
c 157, §2]

Cross References

Constitutional provisions, see Const. art. XVI, §12.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next